Utah statutes.
32B-4-509.   Forgery.

(1) (a)  A person who with a purpose to defraud the commission or the department, or who with knowledge that the person is facilitating a fraud to be perpetrated by anyone, forges a record required under this title, is guilty of forgery as provided under Section 76-6-501.

(b)  A violation of Subsection (1)(a) is a second degree felony.

(2)  A person who with intent to defraud the commission or the department knowingly possesses a record that is a forgery as defined in Section 76-6-501 is guilty of a third degree felony.



Enacted by Chapter 276, 2010 General Session

